apertium-en-ca/partofspeech/apertium_vb.en.dix
<pardef n="le/ad__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ad</l>
          <r>ad<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ad</l>
          <r>ad<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ads</l>
          <r>ad<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>d</l>
          <r>ad<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>d</l>
          <r>ad<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ading</l>
          <r>ad<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ading</l>
          <r>ad<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ading</l>
          <r>ad<s n="vblex"/><s n="subs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>  
    
<pardef n="le/ave__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ave</l>
          <r>ave<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ave</l>
          <r>ave<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>aves</l>
          <r>ave<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ft</l>
          <r>ave<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ft</l>
          <r>ave<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>aving</l>
          <r>ave<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>aving</l>
          <r>ave<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>aving</l>
          <r>ave<s n="vblex"/><s n="subs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>      
    
<pardef n="l/ie__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ie</l>
          <r>ie<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ie</l>
          <r>ie<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ies</l>
          <r>ie<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ay</l>
          <r>ie<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ain</l>
          <r>ie<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ying</l>
          <r>ie<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ying</l>
          <r>ie<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ying</l>
          <r>ie<s n="vblex"/><s n="subs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    
<pardef n="lo/se__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>se</l>
          <r>se<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>se</l>
          <r>se<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ses</l>
          <r>se<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>st</l>
          <r>se<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>st</l>
          <r>se<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>sing</l>
          <r>se<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>sing</l>
          <r>se<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>sing</l>
          <r>se<s n="vblex"/><s n="subs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    
<pardef n="ma/ke__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ke</l>
          <r>ke<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ke</l>
          <r>ke<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>kes</l>
          <r>ke<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>de</l>
          <r>ke<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>de</l>
          <r>ke<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>king</l>
          <r>ke<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>king</l>
          <r>ke<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>king</l>
          <r>ke<s n="vblex"/><s n="subs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef> 
    
<pardef n="me/et__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>et</l>
          <r>et<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>et</l>
          <r>et<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ets</l>
          <r>et<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>t</l>
          <r>et<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>t</l>
          <r>et<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eting</l>
          <r>et<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eting</l>
          <r>et<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eting</l>
          <r>et<s n="vblex"/><s n="subs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>  
    
<pardef n="m/elt__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>elt</l>
          <r>elt<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>elt</l>
          <r>elt<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>elts</l>
          <r>elt<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>elted</l>
          <r>elt<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>elted</l>
          <r>elt<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>olted</l>
          <r>elt<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>elting</l>
          <r>elt<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>elting</l>
          <r>elt<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>elting</l>
          <r>elt<s n="vblex"/><s n="subs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>            
    
<pardef n="read__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>s</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ing</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ing</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ing</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="subs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>    
    

<e lm="lead"><i>le</i><par n="le/ad__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="leave"><i>le</i><par n="le/ave__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="lose"><i>lo</i><par n="lo/se__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="make"><i>ma</i><par n="ma/ke__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="meet"><i>me</i><par n="me/et__vblex"/></e>
 <e lm="make sure"><i>ma</i><par n="ma/ke__vblex"/><p><l><b/>sure</l><r><g><b/>sure</g></r></p></e>
<e lm="reread"><i>reread</i> <par n="read__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="overheat"><i>overheat</i><par n="read__vblex" /></e>
